Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.280

Violation of temporary cease and desist order—Injunction to enforce order.

In the case of a violation or threatened violation of a temporary cease and desist order issued under RCW 32.04.260, the director may apply to the superior court of the county of the principal place of business of the mutual savings bank for an injunction to enforce the order. The court shall issue an injunction if it determines there has been a violation or threatened violation.

[ 1994 c 92 s 304; 1979 c 46 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 46: See note following RCW 32.04.250.